cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Pomůcky pro péči o obuv: Háky na obouvání; Pytle na boty; Kartáče na boty; Sady pro péči o obuv; Vysoušeče bot; Nazouvací lžíce; Leštičky bot; Leštidla a vosky na boty; Škrabky na obuv; Prostředky na ošetření a barvení obuvi; Kopyta a tvarovače bot
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Njega cipela i dodaci: Izvlakači čizama; Vreće za cipele; Četke za cipele; Kompleti za održavanje obuće; Sušilice za cipele; Žlice za cipele i pomagala za oblačenje; Pomagala za laštenje cipela; Laštila i voskovi za cipele; Strugalice za cipele; Sredstva za tretiranje i boje za cipele; Napinjači i kalupi za cipele
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia: Przyrządy do zdejmowania butów; Torby na buty; Szczotki do butów; Zestawy do pielęgnacji obuwia; Suszarki do butów; Łyżki do butów i pomoce do ubierania; Polerki do butów; Pasty i woski do butów; Skrobaczki do butów; Środki do pielęgnacji i farbowania butów; Prawidła do butów
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Nega obutve in orodja: Kavlji za obuvanje škornjev; Vreče za obutev; Ščetke za obutev; Kompleti za nego obutve; Sušilniki za čevlje; Žlice za čevlje in pripomočki za obuvanje; Loščilniki za čevlje; Polirne paste in voski za čevlje; Strgala za obutev; Sredstva in barve za nego obutve; Leseni vložki in napenjalci za obutev
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Cipőápolás és -eszközök: Csizmahúzók; Cipőtáskák; Cipőkefék; Cipőápoló készletek; Cipőszárítók; Cipőkanalak és öltözködési segédeszközök; Cipőfényezők; Cipőfényesítők és -viaszok; Cipőkaparók; Cipőkezelések és -festékek; Cipőfák és -formázók
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ chăm sóc giày: Dụng cụ hỗ trợ đi bốt; Túi đựng giày; Bàn chải đánh giày; Bộ dụng cụ chăm sóc giày; Máy sấy khô giày; Gậy hỗ trợ mặc áo và sừng giúp cởi giày; Máy đánh bóng giày; Xi & Sáp đánh bóng giày; Gạt bùn đế giày; Sản phẩm nhuộm và bảo quản giày; Nòng và khuôn giày
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Cuidado del calzado: Descalzadores de botas; Bolsas para zapatos; Cepillos para zapatos; Kits para el cuidado del calzado; Secadores para zapatos; Calzadores; Pulidoras para calzado; Betunes y ceras para zapatos; Limpiabarros; Tintes y tratamientos para el calzado; Hormas y ensanchadores de zapatos
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos: Tiradores de botas; Sacos para sapatos; Escovas de sapato; Kits para cuidados com sapatos; Secadores de sapatos; Calçadeiras; Polidor de sapatos; Polidores e ceras de engraxar sapatos; Limpador de sola de sapato; Tratamentos e corantes para calçados; Formas e modeladores para sapatos
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Shoe Care & Tools: Boot Pulls; Shoe Bags; Shoe Brushes; Shoe Care Kits; Shoe Dryers; Shoe Horns & Dressing Aids; Shoe Polishers; Shoe Polishes & Waxes; Shoe Scrapers; Shoe Treatments & Dyes; Shoe Trees & Shapers
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Nástroje na starostlivosť o obuv: Naťahovače čižiem; Tašky na topánky; Kefky na topánky; Súpravy starostlivosti o obuv; Sušiče topánok; Obuváky a pomôcky pri obliekaní; Leštidlá na obuv; Leštidlá a vosky na obuv; Škrabky na obuv; Prípravky na ošetrenie obuvi a farby; Rozťahováky a napínače obuvi
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Cura delle scarpe: Calzastivali; Borse per scarpe; Spazzole da scarpe; Kit per la cura delle scarpe; Asciugatori scarpe; Calzascarpe e ausili per vestirsi; Lucidascarpe; Lucidi e cere scarpe; Pulisciscarpe; Trattamenti e tinture per scarpe; Allargascarpe
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Kenkien hoito ja välineet: Saapasrengit; Kenkäkassit; Kenkäharjat; Kenkien hoitosetit; Kenkien kuivaajat; Kenkälusikat ja pukeutumisen apuvälineet; Kenkien kiillotusaineet; Kenkien kiillotusaineet ja vahat; Harjatelineet; Kenkienhoitotuotteet ja lankit; Kenkäpuut ja muotoilijat
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Грижа за обувки и пособия: Обувалки за ботуши; Чанти за обувки; Четки за обувки; Комплекти за грижа за обувки; Сушилници за обувки; Обувалки и помощни средства за обличане; Уреди за полиране на обувки; Препарати за полиране и вакси; Стъргалки за обувки; Препарати за третиране на обувки и бои; Дървета и оформящи средства за обувки
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 鞋类保养/工具: 脱靴器; 鞋袋; 鞋刷; 鞋护理套装; 干鞋器; 鞋拔/穿衣辅助用品; 擦鞋机; 鞋油/鞋蜡; 刮鞋工具; 鞋类护理用品/染色剂; 鞋楦/鞋撑
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleje og redskaber: Støvleknægte; Skoposer; Skobørster; Skopudsersæt; Skotørrere; Skohorn og påklædningshjælpemidler; Skopudsning; Skopudsemiddel og -voks; Skoskrabere; Skobehandling og -farve; Skolæste og skostivere
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Товары для ухода за обувью: Съемники для обуви; Мешки для обуви; Щетки для обуви; Наборы для ухода за обувью; Сушилки для обуви; Рожки для обуви и приспособления для надевания; Электрощетки для обуви; Кремы и воск для обуви; Скребки и щетки для очистки подошв; Средства по уходу за обувью и краски; Колодки и формодержатели для обуви
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη & εργαλεία περιποίησης υποδημάτων: Βοηθήματα αφαίρεσης μποτών; Τσάντες υποδημάτων; Βούρτσες υποδημάτων; Σετ περιποίησης υποδημάτων; Στεγνωτήρια υποδημάτων; Κουτάλια υποδημάτων & βοηθήματα ένδυσης; Γυαλιστικές μηχανές υποδημάτων; Γυαλιστικά & κεριά παπουτσιών; Ξύστρες υποδημάτων; Επεξεργασίες & βαφές υποδημάτων; Καλούπια & διαμορφωτές υποδημάτων
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 신발 관리 도구: 부츠잭; 신발 가방; 구둣솔; 신발 관리 키트; 신발 건조기; 신발 주걱/착복용품; 신발 광택기; 구두 광택제/왁스; 신발털개; 신발 관리/염색 용품; 슈트리/신발 셰이퍼
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Utensílios e cuidado de calçado: Calçadores de botas; Sacos para calçado; Escovas para calçado; Kits de cuidado de calçado; Secadores para calçado; Calçadeiras e auxiliares para calçar; Graxa para calçado; Graxas e ceras para calçado; Máquina de limpeza de sola do calçado; Tratamentos e tinta para calçado; Formas e moldes para calçado
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures: Retire-bottes; Sacs à chaussures; Brosses à chaussures; Kits d’entretien de chaussures; Sèche-chaussures; Chausse-pieds et aide à l’habillage; Cireuses à chaussures; Cirages et cires à chaussures; Grattoirs à chaussures; Produits pour l’entretien de chaussures; Embauchoirs
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > เครื่องมือและการดูแลรองเท้า: ตะขอดึงรองเท้าบูท; ถุงรองเท้า; แปรงขัดรองเท้า; ชุดดูแลรองเท้า; เครื่องเป่าแห้งของรองเท้า; ช้อนใส่รองเท้าและอุปกรณ์ช่วยแต่งตัว; เครื่องขัดรองเท้า; ยาขัดและแวกซ์สำหรับรองเท้า; แปรงปัดรองเท้า; ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลรักษาและแต่งสีรองเท้า; ที่ดันทรงรองเท้า
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleie og -verktøy: Skoavtrekkere; Skoposer; Skobørster; Sett for skopleie; Skotørkere; Skojern og påkledningshjelp; Skobørste; Skokrem og voks for sko; Skoskrapere; Skobehandling og -farging; Skotrær og -formere
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri: Çizme Çekecekleri; Ayakkabı Çantaları; Ayakkabı Fırçaları; Ayakkabı Bakım Setleri; Ayakkabı Kurutucular; Keratalar ve Giyim Yardımcıları; Ayakkabı Parlatıcıları; Ayakkabı Parlatıcı ve Cilaları; Ayakkabı Paspasları; Ayakkabı Bakım Ürünleri ve Boyaları; Ayakkabı Kalıp ve Şekillendiricileri
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 靴のお手入れ: ブーツフック; シューズケース; 靴ブラシ; 靴お手入れセット; 靴乾燥機; 靴べら・ドレッシングエイド; 靴磨き; 靴磨き・靴墨; 靴用スクレーパー; 靴ケア用品・染料; シューキーパー・ストレッチャー
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Schuhpflege: Stiefelknechte; Schuhbeutel; Schuhbürsten; Schuhpflegesets; Schuhtrockner; Schuhanzieher; Schuhpolierer; Schuhpolituren & -wachse; Schuhabstreifer; Schuhpflege- & Färbemittel; Schuhspanner & -dehner
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 鞋子保養工具: 脫靴器; 鞋袋; 鞋刷; 鞋類保養組; 烘鞋器; 鞋拔和穿衣輔助器; 擦鞋機; 鞋油/鞋蠟; 鞋底刷; 鞋子保養和染色工具; 鞋撐
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoenverzorging: Laarzenknecht; Schoenenzakken; Schoenborstels; Schoenverzorgingssets; Schoendrogers; Schoenlepels; Schoenpoetsmachines; Schoenpoetsmiddelen; Schoenschrapers; Schoenbehandelingen en verf; Schoenspanners
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse și instrumente pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei: Cârlig pentru cizme; Huse pentru pantofi; Perii pentru pantofi; Seturi pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei; Uscătoare de pantofi; Încălțătoare și accesorii pentru încălțat; Produse pentru lustruit pantofi; Cremă și ceară de pantofi; Raclete pentru încălțăminte; Tratamente și coloranți pentru încălțăminte; Șanuri și calapoade
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Batų priežiūra ir įrankiai: Batų traukikliai; Batų krepšiai; Batų šepečiai; Batų priežiūros rinkiniai; Batų džiovintuvai; Batų šaukštai ir pagalbinės apsiavimo priemonės; Batų blizginimo priemonės; Batų tepalas ir vaškas; Batų grandikliai; Batų priežiūros priemonės ir dažai; Batų formos ir tempikliai
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Skovård och skoverktyg: Stövelknektar; Skopåsar; Skoborstar; Skovårdskit; Skotorkare; Skohorn och påklädningshjälpmedel; Skokrämer; Skokräm och skoputsmedel; Skoskrapar; Skobehandling och färgmedel; Skoblock